Nebraska, session 109, LB171.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB171 LB171
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 77-2715.03, Revised Statutes Cumulative
Supplement, 2024, is amended to read:
77-2715.03 (1) For taxable years beginning or deemed to begin on or
after January 1, 2013, and before January 1, 2014, the following brackets
and rates are hereby established for the Nebraska individual income tax:
Individual Income Tax Brackets and Rates
Bracket Single Married, Head of Married, Estates Tax
Number Individuals Filing Household Filing and Rate
Jointly Separate Trusts
1 $0-2,399 $0-4,799 $0-4,499 $0-2,399 $0-499 2.46%
2 $2,400- $4,800- $4,500- $2,400- $500-
17,499 34,999 27,999 17,499 4,699 3.51%
3 $17,500- $35,000- $28,000- $17,500- $4,700-
26,999 53,999 39,999 26,999 15,149 5.01%
4 $27,000 $54,000 $40,000 $27,000 $15,150
and Over and Over and Over and Over and Over 6.84%
(2)(a) For taxable years beginning or deemed to begin on or after
January 1, 2014, the following brackets and rates are hereby established
for the Nebraska individual income tax:
Individual Income Tax Brackets and Rates
Bracket Single Married, Head of Married, Estates Tax
Number Individuals Filing Household Filing and Rate
Jointly Separate Trusts
1 $0-2,999 $0-5,999 $0-5,599 $0-2,999 $0-499 2.46%
2 $3,000- $6,000- $5,600- $3,000- $500-
17,999 35,999 28,799 17,999 4,699 3.51%
3 $18,000- $36,000- $28,800- $18,000- $4,700- Rate
28,999 57,999 42,999 28,999 15,149 Three
4 $29,000 $58,000 $43,000 $29,000 $15,150 Rate
and Over and Over and Over and Over and Over Four
-2-

LB171 LB171
2025 2025
(b) For purposes of this subsection, rate three shall be:
(i) 5.01% for taxable years beginning or deemed to begin on or after
January 1, 2014, and before January 1, 2026; and
(ii) 4.99% 4.55% for taxable years beginning or deemed to begin on
or after January 1, 2026. , and before January 1, 2027; and
(iii) 3.99% for taxable years beginning or deemed to begin on or
after January 1, 2027.
(c) For purposes of this subsection, rate four shall be:
(i) 6.84% for taxable years beginning or deemed to begin on or after
January 1, 2014, and before January 1, 2023;
(ii) 6.64% for taxable years beginning or deemed to begin on or
after January 1, 2023, and before January 1, 2024;
(iii) 5.84% for taxable years beginning or deemed to begin on or
after January 1, 2024, and before January 1, 2025;
(iv) 5.20% for taxable years beginning or deemed to begin on or
after January 1, 2025, and before January 1, 2026; and
(v) 4.99% 4.55% for taxable years beginning or deemed to begin on or
after January 1, 2026. , and before January 1, 2027; and
(vi) 3.99% for taxable years beginning or deemed to begin on or
after January 1, 2027.
(3)(a) For taxable years beginning or deemed to begin on or after
January 1, 2015, the minimum and maximum dollar amounts for each income
tax bracket provided in subsection (2) of this section shall be adjusted
for inflation by the percentage determined under subdivision (3)(b) of
this section. The rate applicable to any such income tax bracket shall
not be changed as part of any adjustment under this subsection. The
minimum and maximum dollar amounts for each income tax bracket as
adjusted shall be rounded to the nearest ten-dollar amount. If the
adjusted amount for any income tax bracket ends in a five, it shall be
rounded up to the nearest ten-dollar amount.
(b)(i) For taxable years beginning or deemed to begin on or after
-3-

LB171 LB171
2025 2025
January 1, 2015, and before January 1, 2018, the Tax Commissioner shall
adjust the income tax brackets by the percentage determined pursuant to
the provisions of section 1(f) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as
it existed prior to December 22, 2017, except that in section 1(f)(3)(B)
of the code the year 2013 shall be substituted for the year 1992. For
2015, the Tax Commissioner shall then determine the percent change from
the twelve months ending on August 31, 2013, to the twelve months ending
on August 31, 2014, and in each subsequent year, from the twelve months
ending on August 31, 2013, to the twelve months ending on August 31 of
the year preceding the taxable year. The Tax Commissioner shall prescribe
new tax rate schedules that apply in lieu of the schedules set forth in
subsection (2) of this section.
(ii) For taxable years beginning or deemed to begin on or after
January 1, 2018, the Tax Commissioner shall adjust the income tax
brackets based on the percentage change in the Consumer Price Index for
All Urban Consumers published by the federal Bureau of Labor Statistics
from the twelve months ending on August 31, 2016, to the twelve months
ending on August 31 of the year preceding the taxable year. The Tax
Commissioner shall prescribe new tax rate schedules that apply in lieu of
the schedules set forth in subsection (2) of this section.
(4) Whenever the tax brackets or tax rates are changed by the
Legislature, the Tax Commissioner shall update the tax rate schedules to
reflect the new tax brackets or tax rates and shall publish such updated
schedules.
(5) The Tax Commissioner shall prepare, from the rate schedules, tax
tables which can be used by a majority of the taxpayers to determine
their Nebraska tax liability. The design of the tax tables shall be
determined by the Tax Commissioner. The size of the tax table brackets
may change as the level of income changes. The difference in tax between
two tax table brackets shall not exceed fifteen dollars. The Tax
Commissioner may build the personal exemption credit and standard
-4-

LB171 LB171
2025 2025
deduction amounts into the tax tables.
(6) For taxable years beginning or deemed to begin on or after
January 1, 2013, the tax rate applied to other federal taxes included in
the computation of the Nebraska individual income tax shall be 29.6
percent.
(7) The Tax Commissioner may require by rule and regulation that all
taxpayers shall use the tax tables if their income is less than the
maximum income included in the tax tables.
Sec. 2. Section 77-2734.02, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
77-2734.02 (1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section,
a tax is hereby imposed on the taxable income of every corporate taxpayer
that is doing business in this state:
(a) For taxable years beginning or deemed to begin before January 1,
2013, at a rate equal to one hundred fifty and eight-tenths percent of
the primary rate imposed on individuals under section 77-2701.01 on the
first one hundred thousand dollars of taxable income and at the rate of
two hundred eleven percent of such rate on all taxable income in excess
of one hundred thousand dollars. The resultant rates shall be rounded to
the nearest one hundredth of one percent;
(b) For taxable years beginning or deemed to begin on or after
January 1, 2013, and before January 1, 2022, at a rate equal to 5.58
percent on the first one hundred thousand dollars of taxable income and
at the rate of 7.81 percent on all taxable income in excess of one
hundred thousand dollars;
(c) For taxable years beginning or deemed to begin on or after
January 1, 2022, and before January 1, 2023, at a rate equal to 5.58
percent on the first one hundred thousand dollars of taxable income and
at the rate of 7.50 percent on all taxable income in excess of one
hundred thousand dollars;
(d) For taxable years beginning or deemed to begin on or after
-5-

LB171 LB171
2025 2025
January 1, 2023, and before January 1, 2024, at a rate equal to 5.58
percent on the first one hundred thousand dollars of taxable income and
at the rate of 7.25 percent on all taxable income in excess of one
hundred thousand dollars;
(e) For taxable years beginning or deemed to begin on or after
January 1, 2024, and before January 1, 2025, at a rate equal to 5.58
percent on the first one hundred thousand dollars of taxable income and
at the rate of 5.84 percent on all taxable income in excess of one
hundred thousand dollars;
(f) For taxable years beginning or deemed to begin on or after
January 1, 2025, and before January 1, 2026, at the rate of 5.20 percent
on all taxable income; and
(g) For taxable years beginning or deemed to begin on or after
January 1, 2026, and before January 1, 2027, at the rate of 4.99 4.55
percent on all taxable income. ; and
(h) For taxable years beginning or deemed to begin on or after
January 1, 2027, at the rate of 3.99 percent on all taxable income.
For corporate taxpayers with a fiscal year that does not coincide
with the calendar year, the individual rate used for this subsection
shall be the rate in effect on the first day, or the day deemed to be the
first day, of the taxable year.
(2) An insurance company shall be subject to taxation at the lesser
of the rate described in subsection (1) of this section or the rate of
tax imposed by the state or country in which the insurance company is
domiciled if the insurance company can establish to the satisfaction of
the Tax Commissioner that it is domiciled in a state or country other
than Nebraska that imposes on Nebraska domiciled insurance companies a
retaliatory tax against the tax described in subsection (1) of this
section.
(3) For a corporate taxpayer that is subject to tax in another
state, its taxable income shall be the portion of the taxpayer's federal
-6-

LB171 LB171
2025 2025
taxable income, as adjusted, that is determined to be connected with the
taxpayer's operations in this state pursuant to sections 77-2734.05 to
77-2734.15.
(4) Each corporate taxpayer shall file only one income tax return
for each taxable year.
Sec. 3. Original sections 77-2715.03 and 77-2734.02, Revised
Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, are repealed.
-7-